Utah statutes.
15-9-104.   Athlete agents -- Registration required -- Void contracts.

(1)  Except as otherwise provided in Subsection (2), an individual may not act as an athlete agent in this state without holding a certificate of registration under Section 15-9-106 or 15-9-108.

(2)  Before being issued a certificate of registration, an individual may act as an athlete agent in this state for all purposes except signing an agency contract, if:

(a)  a student-athlete or another person acting on behalf of the student-athlete initiates communication with the individual; and

(b)  within seven days after an initial act as an athlete agent, the individual submits an application for registration as an athlete agent in this state.

(3)  An agency contract resulting from conduct in violation of this section is void and the athlete agent shall return any consideration received under the contract.

